Arkansas, session 2025, SB618.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-60-1404(c)(1)(B)(iv), concerning the
procedural protection of attorney representation under the Arkansas Student
Due Process and Protection Act, is amended to add an additional subdivision
to read as follows:
(c) An institution shall advise a student who
is the subject of an investigation or disciplinary proceeding under this
subchapter that he or she may seek representation by an attorney.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-60-1404(c)(1)(F)(ii), concerning the time
frame for filing appeals under the Arkansas Student Due Process and
Protection Act, is amended to read as follows:
(ii) An appeal under subdivision (c)(1)(F)(i) of
this section shall be filed within twenty-five (25) seven (7) days after a
student or student organization receives final notice of an institution's
decision.
*CRH330*
04/03/2025 9:54:28 AM CRH330